sv: Fixeringsgrad: Lätt; Medium; Stark; Övrigt
fr: Niveau de maintien: Léger; Moyen; Fort; Autre
sl-SI: Stopnja moči: Rahla; Srednja; Močna; Drugo
en: Hold level: Light; Medium; Strong; Other
it: Livello di tenuta: Leggero; Medio; Forte; Altro
pl: Poziom wstrzymania: Lekki; Środek; Bardzo mocny; Inne
nl: Vasthoudniveau: Licht; Medium; Sterk; Andere
sk-SK: Úroveň fixácie: Ľahký; Stredný; Silný; Iné
zh-CN: 定型水平: 轻; 媒介; 强; 其他
pt-PT: Nível de fixação: Ligeira; Médio; Forte; Outro
fi: Pitotaso: Kevyt; Keskimääräinen; Vahva; Muu
nb: Holdnivå: Lett; Middels; Sterk; Annet
pt-BR: Manter nível: Leve; Médio; Forte; Outro
ja: ホールドレベル: 軽い; 媒体; ストロング; その他
ko: 홀드 수준: 가벼움; 매체; 강함; 기타
da: Holdeniveau: Let; Medium; Stærk; Andet
ru: Степень фиксации: Легкий; Средний; Прочный; Другой
es: Nivel de fijación: Ligero; Medio; Fuerte; Otros
bg-BG: Ниво на задържане: Лек; Среден; Силен; Други
tr: Tutma Seviyesi: Hafif; Orta; Güçlü; Diğer
el: Επίπεδο συγκράτησης: Ελαφριά; Μέση; Ισχυρή; Άλλο
hu: Tartás szintje: Enyhe; Közepes; Erős; Egyéb
ro-RO: Nivel fixare: Ușor; Mediu; Puternic; Altele
th: ระดับการถือ: ตึงเล็กน้อย; สื่อ; ติดทนมาก; อื่นๆ
vi: Mức độ giữ nếp: Nhẹ; Vừa; Mạnh; Khác
de: Haltstufe: Leicht; Medium; Stark; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 支撐等級: 輕型; 媒介; 強; 其他
lt-LT: Fiksavimo lygis: Lengva; Vidutinė; Stipri; Kita
cs: Stupeň natužení: Lehká; Médium; Silné; Jiné
hr-HR: Razina učvršćivanja: Lagano; Srednje; Jako; Ostalo